test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-makw6_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - makõ1: # Noun (6) makõ1 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     makõ+Hom1+N+Sg+Nom: makõ
     makõ+Hom1+N+Sg+Gen: makõ
     makõ+Hom1+N+Sg+Par: makõt
     makõ+Hom1+N+Sg+Ill: makkõhe
     makõ+Hom1+N+Pl+Gen: makkidõ
     makõ+Hom1+N+Pl+Par: makkit
     makõ+Hom1+N+Pl+Ill: makkihe
     makõ+Hom1+N+Pl+All: makkilõ
